Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB141.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 302. Imposition of Tax.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (c)[, every]:(1) Every resident individual, estate or trust shall be subject to, and shall pay for the privilege of receiving each of the classes of income hereinafter enumerated in section 303, a tax upon each dollar of income received by that resident during 123456789101112131415161718192021 that resident's taxable year at the rate of three and seven hundredths per cent. This paragraph shall not apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2025.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), every resident individual, estate or trust shall be subject to, and shall pay for the privilege of receiving each of the classes of income hereinafter enumerated in section 303, a tax upon each dollar of income received by that resident during that resident's taxable year at the rate of nine and seven hundredths per cent. This paragraph shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2025.(3) Every resident individual, estate or trust shall be subject to, and shall pay for the privilege of receiving each of the classes of income hereinafter enumerated in section 303(a)(1), (2) and (4), a tax upon each dollar of income received by that resident during that resident's taxable year at the rate of three and seven hundredths per cent. This paragraph shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2025.(b) Except as provided in subsection (c)[, every]:(1) Every nonresident individual, estate or trust shall be subject to, and shall pay for the privilege of receiving each of the classes of income hereinafter enumerated in section 303 from sources within this Commonwealth, a tax upon each dollar of income received by that nonresident during that nonresident's taxable year at the rate of three and seven hundredths per cent. This paragraph shall not apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2025.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), every nonresident individual, estate or trust shall be subject to, and shall pay for the privilege of receiving each of the classes of income 20260HB0141PN3070 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hereinafter enumerated in section 303, a tax upon each dollar of income received by that nonresident during that nonresident's taxable year at the rate of nine and seven hundredths per cent. This paragraph shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2025.(3) Every nonresident individual, estate or trust shall be subject to, and shall pay for the privilege of receiving each of the classes of income hereinafter enumerated in section 303(a)(1), (2) and (4), a tax upon each dollar of income received by that nonresident during that nonresident's taxable year at the rate of three and seven hundredths per cent. This paragraph shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2025.(c) The classes of income under section 303 received by a resident trust, and the classes of income received by a nonresident trust from sources within this Commonwealth, shall be taxable to the grantor of the trust or another person to the extent the grantor or other person is treated as the owner of the trust under sections 671, 672, 673, 674, 675, 676, 677, 678 and 679 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.), as amended, whether or not [such] the income is distributed or distributable to the beneficiaries of the trust or accumulated.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB0141PN3070 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223